Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-204
Certificate of acknowledgment; form; acceptance.

The form of a certificate of acknowledgment used by a person whose authority is recognized under section 64-201 shall be accepted in this state if:

(1) The certificate is in a form prescribed by the laws or regulations of this state;

(2) The certificate is in a form prescribed by the laws or regulations applicable in the place in which the acknowledgment is taken; or

(3) The certificate contains the words acknowledged before me, or their substantial equivalent.

Laws 1969, c. 523, § 4, p. 2141.